Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,134
Irrigation districts; excluded lands not taxable.

No irrigation district, company or corporation shall include within its district for purposes of levying taxes, bonds or assessments any land which has formerly been set out of the district, unless the owner of such lands shall consent to have his land thus reinstated in the district.

Laws 1917, c. 197, § 1, p. 472;

C.S.1922, § 2941;

C.S.1929, § 46-199;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,134.